Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1572HH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 53 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 314.32 President Donald J. Trump 1 highway ââ signs purchased and installed by private entities. 2 1. The highway known as United States highway 75 which 3 crosses this state from Sioux City to the Minnesota border 4 north of Rock Rapids shall be designated as the âPresident 5 Donald J. Trump Highwayâ. 6 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 7 17A to provide for an application, approval, and inspection 8 process for the purchase and installation of signs indicating 9 the âPresident Donald J. Trump Highwayâ designation by private 10 entities. The department shall approve applications for sign 11 purchase and installation that meet its rule requirements. All 12 costs and expenses of the purchase and installation of the 13 signs shall be paid by the private entity whose application is 14 approved. The department may approve more than one application 15 to purchase and install the signs. 16 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to the highway 17 known as United States highway 75 described in this Act on the 18 effective date of this Act, and shall apply to that highway 19 thereafter regardless of whether the highwayâs designation 20 as United States highway 75 is subsequently changed by the 21 government of the United States. 22